Massachusetts, session 194th, S2228.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 1B of chapter 164 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by striking out, in subsection (d), the words “periods of up to six months” and 
inserting in place thereof the following words:- the period of time resulting from the competitive 
bidding process.